src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Tense
@U.tense.PRSHAB@:@U.tense.PRSHAB@na%< Set_B ;
@U.tense.RECPST@:@U.tense.RECPST@x%< Set_B ;
@U.tense.Fut@:@U.tense.Fut@t%< Set_B ;
@U.tense.3Sgi@@U.tense.REMPST@:@U.tense.3Sgi@@U.tense.REMPST@k%< Set_B ;
@U.tense.3Sgi@@U.tense.Imp@:@U.tense.3Sgi@@U.tense.Imp@ch%< Set_B ;
@U.tense.3Sgi@@U.tense.NegImp@:@U.tense.3Sgi@@U.tense.NegImp@m%< Set_B ;

@U.tense.Inf@ Verbs;
@U.verb.root@ Verbs;

LEXICON Set_B
@U.Abs.Sg1@:@U.Abs.Sg1@in%< Set_B_2 ;
@U.Abs.Pl1@:@U.Abs.Pl1@koo%< Set_B_2 ;
@U.Abs.Sg2@:@U.Abs.Sg2@kat%< Set_B_2 ;
@U.Abs.Pl2@:@U.Abs.Pl2@kex%< Set_B_2 ;
@D.tense.3Sgi@@D.tense.Fut@@U.Abs.Sg3@:@D.tense.3Sgi@@D.tense.Fut@@U.Abs.Sg3@%<   Set_B_2 ;
@U.tense.Fut@@U.Abs.Sg3@:@U.tense.Fut@@U.Abs.Sg3@aa%< Set_B_2 ;
@U.tense.3Sgi@@U.Abs.Sg3@:@U.tense.3Sgi@@U.Abs.Sg3@i%< Set_B_2 ;
@U.Abs.Pl3@:@U.Abs.Pl3@ke'%< Set_B_2 ;

LEXICON Set_B_2
Set_A ;
intransitive_roots ;

LEXICON Set_A
@U.Erg.Sg1@@D.Abs.Sg1@:@U.Erg.Sg1@@D.Abs.Sg1@%{Poss.Sg1%}%{Poss.Sg1%} Verbs;
@U.Erg.Pl1@@D.Abs.Pl1@:@U.Erg.Pl1@@D.Abs.Pl1@q%{Poss.Pl1%} Verbs;
@U.Erg.Sg2@@D.Abs.Sg2@:@U.Erg.Sg2@@D.Abs.Sg2@aa%{Poss.Sg2%} Verbs;
@U.Erg.Pl2@@D.Abs.Pl2@:@U.Erg.Pl2@@D.Abs.Pl2@ee%{Poss.Pl2%} Verbs;
@U.Erg.Sg3@:@U.Erg.Sg3@%{Poss.Sg3%} Verbs;
@U.Erg.Pl3@@D.Abs.Pl3@:@U.Erg.Pl3@@D.Abs.Pl3@e'%{Erg.Pl3%} Verbs;
@U.Erg.INT@ Verbs;

LEXICON V
+V:                                             Tense_tags;
@U.verb.root@+V+Root:@U.verb.root@ # ; !TO remove in constraint grammar, treat roots as Lemmas

LEXICON Tense_tags
@U.tense.RECPST@+RECPST:@U.tense.RECPST@ Absolutive_tags;
@U.tense.Fut@+Fut:@U.tense.RECPST@ Absolutive_tags;
@U.tense.PRSHAB@+Prs:@U.tense.PRSHAB@ Absolutive_tags;
@U.tense.REMPST@+REMPST:@U.tense.REMPST@ Absolutive_tags;
@U.tense.Inf@+Inf:@U.tense.Inf@ #;

LEXICON Absolutive_tags !TODO set B Absolutive Set A ergative
@U.Abs.Sg1@+SetB.Sg1:@U.Abs.Sg1@ Ergative_tags;
@U.Abs.Pl1@+SetB.Pl1:@U.Abs.Pl1@ Ergative_tags;
@U.Abs.Sg2@+SetB.Sg2:@U.Abs.Sg2@ Ergative_tags;
@U.Abs.Pl2@+SetB.Pl2:@U.Abs.Pl2@ Ergative_tags;
@U.Abs.Sg3@+SetB.Sg3:@U.Abs.Sg3@ Ergative_tags;
@U.Abs.Pl3@+SetB.Pl3:@U.Abs.Pl3@ Ergative_tags;

LEXICON Ergative_tags
@U.Erg.Sg1@+SetA.Sg1:@U.Erg.Sg1@ #;
@U.Erg.Pl1@+SetA.Pl1:@U.Erg.Pl1@ #;
@U.Erg.Sg2@+SetA.Sg2:@U.Erg.Sg2@ #;
@U.Erg.Pl2@+SetA.Pl2:@U.Erg.Pl2@ #;
@U.Erg.Sg3@+SetA.Sg3:@U.Erg.Sg3@ #;
@U.Erg.Pl3@+SetA.Pl3:@U.Erg.Pl3@ #;
@U.Erg.INT@:@U.Erg.INT@ #;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!Suffixes!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Intransitive_suffix
:%>k #;
:%>q #;

LEXICON Future_nonFuture
!TODO nonfuture suffix
+V+Prs:k Verb_suffixes;
++Fut:q Verb_suffixes;
+V+3Sg: #;

LEXICON Verb_suffixes
+V+Sg1:in  #;
+V+Pl1:oo  #;
+V+Sg2:at  #;
+V+Pl2:ex  #;
+V+Sg3:    #;
+V+Pl3:eb' #; 

LEXICON V_K
:%{K%} V ;
